Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-4407
Domestic or hybrid animal or livestock; postexposure management.

Domestic or hybrid animals or livestock known to have been exposed to a confirmed or suspected rabid animal shall be subjected to postexposure management as provided in rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the department.

Laws 1969, c. 445, § 7, p. 1487;

Laws 1987, LB 104, § 7;

Laws 2007, LB25, § 9;

Laws 2019, LB61, § 5.